DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI-215

DI6X6-03

DTC

C0226/2 1toC0256/24 | ABS Solenoid Circuit

CIRCUIT

DESCRIPTION

This solenoid goes on when signals are received from the ECU and controls the pressure acting on the wheel
cylinders thus controlling the braking force.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C0226/2 1 Openorshortcircuitin SFRH or SFRR circuit continues for * Hydraulic brake booster
0.015sec.ormore. * SFRH or SFRRcircuit

C0236 /22 Openorshortcircuitin SFLH or SFLR circuit continues for * Hydraulic brake booster
0.015sec.ormore. e SFLHor SFLRcircuit

C0246 /23 Openorshortcircuitin SRRH or SRRR circuit continues for ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
0.015sec.ormore. *SRRHorSRRRcircuit

C0256 / 24 Openorshortcircuitin SRLH or SRLR circuit continues for ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
0.015sec.ormore. *SRLHor SRLRcircuit
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DI-216 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

WIRING DIAGRAM
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-217
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check hydraulic brake booster solenoid.

® LOCK

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the 2 connectors from hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:

Check continuity between each of terminals A48 - 4 and A50

-1,2,3,4,7,8,9 and 10 of hydraulic brake booster connector.
© oK:
Continuity
4 HINT:
Resistance of each solenoid at 20 °C (68 °F)

SFRH, SFLH, SRRH, SRLH: 6.95 - 7.45 Q
SFRR, SFLR, SRRR, SRLR: 2.00 - 2.40 Q

NG> Replace hydraulic brake booster.

@

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between skid control
ECU and actuator (See page IN-38).

@

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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